Maryland, session 2026, SB0619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–264.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0619*

SENATE BILL 619
(2) “CLEAN AND SANITIZE” MEANS TO REMOVE RESIDUE,
CONTAMINANTS, ODORS, AND HARMFUL MICROORGANISMS FROM ALL CONTAINER
SURFACES.
(3) “PROFESSIONAL CLEANING SERVICE” MEANS A LICENSED ENTITY
CAPABLE OF:
(I) CLEANING AND SANITIZING SOLID WASTE CONTAINERS;
AND
(II) AS NECESSARY, TESTING SOLID WASTE CONTAINERS FOR
HARMFUL BACTERIA AND PATHOGENS USING METHODS APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(4) “SOLID WASTE CONTAINER” MEANS A TRASH BIN, DUMPSTER, OR
SIMILAR RECEPTACLE USED FOR THE STORAGE OF MUNICIPAL SOLID WASTE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A SOLID WASTE CONTAINER USED
FOR THE STORAGE OF MUNICIPAL SOLID WASTE FROM A SINGLE–FAMILY HOME.
(C) (1) THE OWNER OF A SOLID WASTE CONTAINER SHALL CONTRACT
WITH A PROFESSIONAL CLEANING SERVICE TO CLEAN AND SANITIZE THE SOLID
WASTE CONTAINER AT LEAST ONCE PER MONTH.
(2) A PROFESSIONAL CLEANING SERVICE CONTRACTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) IMPLEMENT CLEANING AND SANITIZATION PROTOCOLS
THAT INCLUDE:
1. THE USE OF DISINFECTANTS APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT;
2. HIGH–PRESSURE WASHING; AND
3. THE REMOVAL OF ALL ODORS AND VISIBLE
RESIDUES; AND
(II) MAINTAIN DOCUMENTATION OF EACH CLEANING AND
SANITIZATION SERVICE RENDERED TO THE OWNER OF A SOLID WASTE CONTAINER
FOR AT LEAST 12 MONTHS AFTER THE SERVICE DATE.

SENATE BILL 619 3
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY IMPOSE AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $250 ON
A PERSON THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY DELEGATE ITS ENFORCEMENT
AUTHORITY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT.
(3) A PENALTY MAY NOT BE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
UNLESS:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT OR LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT FIRST
ISSUES A WRITTEN NOTICE OF VIOLATION TO THE PERSON; AND
(II) THE VIOLATION IS NOT CORRECTED WITHIN 3 MONTHS
AFTER RECEIPT OF THE WRITTEN NOTICE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE GUIDANCE AND TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE TO LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENTS ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS
SECTION.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
9–268.
Except for violations of Part III of this subtitle and violations enforced under §§
9–229(b), 9–264(D), 9–267, and 9–268.1 of this subtitle, the provisions of §§ 9–334 through
9–344 of this title shall be used and shall apply to enforce violations of:
(1) This subtitle;
(2) Any regulation adopted under this subtitle; or
(3) Any order or permit issued under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.